Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-408
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act:

(1) Demonstration and research farms means large-scale field and pasture settings located across the state that provide a demonstration of healthy soil practices in support of the educational and research programs of the producer learning community;

(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(3) Producer learning community means an agricultural producer-led, nonprofit, voluntary membership organization dedicated to fostering learning, skills, and abilities and the gathering and sharing of knowledge for the purpose of carrying out the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act.

Laws 2022, LB925, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 7.